Arkansas, session 2025, SB379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-18-902(c), concerning the Tax Advisory
Council, is repealed.
(c) The council will develop and submit a report to the chairs of the
House Committee on Revenue and Taxation and the Senate Committee on Revenue
and Taxation.











*JLL179*
03/05/2025 9:58:43 AM JLL179